Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1906
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 545.